dictionaries/ro-ro.aff
#defect de plural
SFX f Y 59
SFX f   Äƒ     a       Äƒ              s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   Äƒ     a-i       Äƒ
SFX f   Äƒ     o       Äƒ
SFX f   ealÄƒ eli      ealÄƒ           s.f.sg.dat.neart
SFX f   ealÄƒ elii      ealÄƒ           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   urÄƒ urii      urÄƒ              s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   urÄƒ uri       urÄƒ             s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   cÄƒ cii      cÄƒ                 s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   cÄƒ ci       cÄƒ                 s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   alÄƒ elii      [^e]alÄƒ           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   alÄƒ eli       [^e]alÄƒ           s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   dÄƒ zi dÄƒ                         s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   dÄƒ zii dÄƒ                        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   e ea      ire                     s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   e eo      ire
SFX f   e ea-i      ire
SFX f   e i      ire                       s.f.sg.neart.dat.
SFX f   e ii      ire                      s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   0 a      oare                   s.f.sg.art
SFX f   0 o      oare
SFX f   0 a-i      oare
SFX f   are ri      oare                s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   are rii      oare               s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   are   Äƒrii    [^oi]are       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   are   Äƒri     [^oi]are       s.f.sg.neart.dat.
SFX f   are   area   [^oi]are      s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   e     ea     ere            s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   e     ii      ere            s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   e     i       ere            s.f.sg.neart.dat.
SFX f  zÄƒ   ze   zÄƒ     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  zÄƒ   zei   zÄƒ     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  inÄƒ   ine   inÄƒ     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  inÄƒ   inei   inÄƒ     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  È›Äƒ   È›e   È›Äƒ     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  È›Äƒ   È›ei   È›Äƒ     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  tÄƒ   te   tÄƒ     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  tÄƒ   tei   tÄƒ     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  nÄƒ   ne   nÄƒ     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  nÄƒ   nei   nÄƒ     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  mÄƒ   me   mÄƒ     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  mÄƒ   mei   mÄƒ     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  fÄƒ   fe   fÄƒ     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  fÄƒ   fei   fÄƒ     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  vÄƒ   ve   vÄƒ     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  vÄƒ   vei   vÄƒ     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  rÄƒ   re   [^u]rÄƒ     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  rÄƒ   rei   [^u]rÄƒ     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  ie   ia    ie         s.f.sg.art.
SFX f  ie   iei    ie         s.f.sg.dat.art.
SFX f  ie   ii    ie         s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   0     a   ime       s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   e     i   ime       s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   e     ii   ime       s.f.sg.dat.art.
SFX f   ate   atea    ate       s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   ate   ÄƒÈ›ii    ate       s.f.sg.dat.art.
SFX f   ate   ÄƒÈ›i     ate       s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   0     a      [iu]ne       s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   e     ii      [iu]ne       s.f.sg.dat.art.
SFX f   e     i       [iu]ne       s.f.sg.dat.neart.


SFX F Y 53
SFX F   Äƒ     a       Äƒ              s.f.sg.art.
SFX F   Äƒ     a-i       Äƒ
SFX F   Äƒ     o       Äƒ
SFX F   ealÄƒ elii      ealÄƒ           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   ealÄƒ eli       ealÄƒ           s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   ealÄƒ  elile     ealÄƒ         s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   ealÄƒ  elilor   ealÄƒ          s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   urÄƒ urii      urÄƒ              s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   urÄƒ uri       urÄƒ             s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   urÄƒ  urile     urÄƒ            s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   urÄƒ  urilor   urÄƒ             s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   cÄƒ cii      cÄƒ                 s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   cÄƒ ci       cÄƒ                 s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   cÄƒ cile     cÄƒ                 s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   cÄƒ cilor    cÄƒ                 s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   alÄƒ elii      [^e]alÄƒ           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   alÄƒ eli       [^e]alÄƒ           s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   alÄƒ elile     [^e]alÄƒ           s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   alÄƒ elilor    [^e]alÄƒ           s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   dÄƒ zi dÄƒ                         s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   dÄƒ zii dÄƒ                        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   dÄƒ zile dÄƒ                       s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   dÄƒ zilor dÄƒ                      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   e ea      ire                     s.f.sg.art.
SFX F   e eo      ire
SFX F   e ea-i      ire
SFX F   e i      ire                       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   e ii      ire                      s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   e ile      ire                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   e ilor      ire                   s.f.pl.dat
SFX F   0 a      oare                   s.f.sg.art
SFX F   0 o      oare
SFX F   0 a-i      oare
SFX F   are ri      oare                s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   are rii      oare               s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   are rile      oare             s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   are rilor      oare            s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   ajÄƒ  Äƒji      ajÄƒ               s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   ajÄƒ  Äƒjii      ajÄƒ              s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   ajÄƒ  Äƒjile      ajÄƒ            s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   ajÄƒ  Äƒjilor      ajÄƒ            s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   Äƒ  i      inÄƒ                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   Äƒ  ii      inÄƒ                   s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   Äƒ  ile      inÄƒ                 s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   Äƒ  ilor      inÄƒ                s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   arÄƒ Äƒri      [^oe]arÄƒ          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   arÄƒ Äƒrii     [^oe]arÄƒ           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   arÄƒ Äƒrile    [^oe]arÄƒ           s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   arÄƒ Äƒrilor   [^oe]arÄƒ           s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   arÄƒ ri      [oe]arÄƒ            s.f.pll.neart.
SFX F   arÄƒ rii     [oe]arÄƒ             s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   arÄƒ rile    [oe]arÄƒ            s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   arÄƒ rilor   [oe]arÄƒ            s.f.pl.dat.
